District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-308.10

Employer interference with employee disclosures; liability of employer; remedies of employee.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 810, 32 DCR 7396
as added Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(ff), 44 DCR 1423
May 8, 1998, D.C. Law 12-104, § 3, 45 DCR 1687
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 3, 46 DCR 2118

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1188.10.